West Virginia, session 2026, SB123.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. State Board of Education. §18-2-25c.  Defibrillator and ambulance required at certain events. (a) In memory of Alex Miller, a Roane County football player who collapsed and died during a school football game, this law shall be known as The Alex Miller Law.(b) By the 2021-2022 school year, the West Virginia Secondary School Activities Commission shall require that an automated external defibrillator device, as well as a posted emergency action plan, be present on the school or event grounds during the duration of all athletic events and practices under the control, supervision, and regulation of the commission, and that appropriate school sports personnel be trained in the use of the device. (c) By the 2026-2027 school year, the commission shall require that an ambulance, if available, be present on the school or event grounds during the duration of all middle school and high school football games under the control, supervision, and regulation of the commission: Provided, That if the ambulance is required to leave due to being called away on an emergency, the game may continue.(c) (d) The commission shall propose rules for promulgation by the State Board in accordance with §29A-3B-1 et seq. of this code to implement the provisions of this section including proximity.(d) (e) No individual, school, county board of education, or other entity shall may be held liable for civil damages when such individual, school, county board of education, or other entity in good faith attempted to comply with the requirements of this section or rules promulgated pursuant thereto.